zh-CN: 管乐器发声方式/原理: 拍击簧（双簧）; 拍击簧（单簧）; 边棱发声; 哨嘴（带气道）; 自由簧; 唇管/气道长笛; 其他
es: Método de afinación y producción sonora de instrumentos de viento: Lengüeta batiente (doble); Lengüeta batiente (simple); Soplado por el borde; Conducto (boquilla); Lengüeta libre; Flauta de pico / labio; Otro
ru: Способ звукоизвлечения духового инструмента: Бьющая трость (двойная); Бьющая трость (одинарная); Продольная (свистковая); Лабиальная (свистковая); Свободная язычковая; Лабиальная флейта; Другое
cs: Metoda ozvučení / produkce zvuku píšťalového nástroje: Nárazový strojek (dvojitý plátek); Nárazový strojek (jednoduchý plátek); Hranová flétna; Labiální píšťala; Průrazný jazýček; Labiální / zobcová flétna; Ostatní
bg-BG: Метод на озвучаване/образуване на звука при тръбен инструмент.: Биещо езиче (двойно); Биещо езиче (единично); С ръб; С блокче (фипъл); Свободно езиче; Лабиум / флейта с канал; Друго
sl-SI: Način intoniranja / proizvodnje zvoka piščali (cevastih instrumentov): Udarni jeziček (dvojni); Udarni jeziček (enojni); Igranje na rob; Ustnična (fipple); Prosti jeziček; Labialna piščal/blokflavta; Drugo
nl: Pijpinstrument stemming/geluidsproductiemethode: Doorslaand riet (dubbel); Doorslaand riet (enkel); Rand aangeblazen; Labium (fipple); Vrij riet; Labium / kernspleetfluit; Overig
vi: Phương pháp tạo âm/phát âm cho nhạc cụ ống: Lưỡi gà đập (kép); Lưỡi gà đập (đơn); Thổi mạn; Ống sáo (fipple); Lưỡi gà tự do; Sáo labium / duct; Khác
hu: Síphangszer hangképzési/hangelőállítási módja: Nyelvsípos (dupla); Nyelvsípos (szimpla); Ajakréses; Dugós; Szabad nyelvsípos; Ajakos / csőrös fuvola; Egyéb
pt-BR: Instrumento de sopro método de sonorização/produção de som: Palheta batente (dupla); Palheta batente (simples); Sopro de aresta; Flauta de bisel (fipple); Palheta livre; Lábio/flauta de duto; Outros
ja: パイプ楽器の音色調整／音作りの方法: 鳴り簧 (ダブルリード); 鳴り簧 (シングルリード); エッジブロウン; 唇管 (フィップル); フリーリード; ラビウム/ダクトフルート; その他
el: Ρύθμιση ήχου πνευστών οργάνων/μέθοδος παραγωγής ήχου: Κρουόμενη γλωττίδα (διπλή); Κρουόμενη γλωττίδα (μονή); Με φύσημα στην άκρη (Edge-blown); Αυλός (fipple); Ελεύθερη γλωττίδα; Labium / φλάουτο με αεραγωγό; Άλλο
ko: 관악기 보이싱/소리 생성 방법: 타음 리드(더블); 타음 리드(싱글); 엣지 블로운; 플루(피플); 프리 리드; 라비움/덕트 플루트; 기타
de: Intonation bzw. Klangerzeugungsmethode des Pfeifeninstruments: Doppelrohrblatt; Einfaches Rohrblatt; Randgeblasen; Spaltflöte (Blockflöte); Durchschlagende Zunge; Labium / Spaltflöte; Andere
pt-PT: Método de sonorização/produção sonora de instrumentos de sopro: Palheta batente (dupla); Palheta batente (simples); De sopro de aresta; De bisel (fipple); Palheta livre; Lábio/flauta de canal; Outro
hr-HR: Metoda ozvučavanja/proizvodnje zvuka cjevastog instrumenta: Udarni jezičak (dvostruki); Udarni jezičak (jednostruki); Puhanje na rub; Zviždaljka s blokom (fipple); Slobodni jezičak; Labijalna svirala / zviždaljka; Ostalo
sv: Ljudalstringssätt för rörinstrument: Dubbelt rörblad; Enkelt rörblad; Kantblåst; Labial (spalt); Fritt rörblad; Spaltflöjt/labialflöjt; Övrigt
pl: Brzmienie/metoda wytwarzania dźwięku instrumentu piszczałkowego: Stroik uderzający (podwójny); Stroik uderzający (pojedynczy); Zadęciowy krawędziowy; Zadęciowy szczelinowy (fipple); Stroik przelotowy; Flet wargowy / kanałowy; Inna
fr: Mode de production sonore de l’instrument: Anche battante (double); Anche battante (simple); À embouchure terminale; À conduit (à bec); Anche libre; Biseau / flûte à conduit; Autre
sk-SK: Intonácia dychových nástrojov/metóda tvorby zvuku: Nárazový jazýček (dvojitý); Nárazový jazýček (jednoduchý); Hranové fúkanie; Píšťalový (zobcový); Voľný jazýček; Labium / hranová píšťala; Iné
da: Blæserinstruments lydfrembringelsesmetode: Dobbelt rørblad; Enkelt rørblad; Kantblæst; Spaltefløjte; Frit rørblad; Læbe/kanalfløjte; Andet
lt-LT: Pučiamojo instrumento įgarsinimo / garso išgavimo metodas: Mušamasis liežuvėlis (dvigubas); Mušamasis liežuvėlis (viengubas); Pučiamas į kraštą; Švilpuko formos (fipple); Laisvasis liežuvėlis; Švilpuko tipo fleita; Kita
en: Pipe instrument voicing / sound production method: Beating reed (double); Beating reed (single); Edge-blown; Flue (fipple); Free reed; Labium / duct flute; Other
tr: Borulu çalgı ses üretim yöntemi: Çarpmalı kamış (çift); Çarpmalı kamış (tek); Kenardan üflemeli; Dilli; Serbest kamış; Labium / kanallı flüt; Diğer
it: Intonazione dello strumento a canne / metodo di produzione del suono: Ad ancia battente (doppia); Ad ancia battente (singola); A imboccatura; A fessura (a becco); Ad ancia libera; Labbro / flauto a condotto; Altro
nb: Stemmesetting / lydproduksjonsmetode for pipeinstrument: Slående rørblad (dobbelt); Slående rørblad (enkelt); Kantblåst; Spaltefløyte; Fritt rørblad; Labium / kanalfløyte; Annet
fi: Pilli-instrumentin äänentuottotapa: Kaksoislehdykkä; Yksittäislehdykkä; Reunaan puhallettava; Huulipilli (tulppa); Vapaalehdykkä; Huulipilli / tulppahuilu; Muu
ro-RO: Metoda de producere a sunetului la instrumentele de tip fluier: Ancie dublă bătătoare; Ancie simplă bătătoare; Suflat pe margine; Cu muștiuc (fipple); Ancie liberă; Flaut cu canal/labium; Altele
zh-TW: 管樂器發聲/聲音產生方式: 拍擊簧 (雙簧); 拍擊簧 (單簧); 邊稜氣鳴式; 哨嘴式; 自由簧; 唇管/導氣管長笛; 其他
th: วิธีการปรับเสียง/สร้างเสียงของเครื่องดนตรีประเภทเป่า: ลิ้นแบบตี (คู่); ลิ้นแบบตี (เดี่ยว); เป่าที่ขอบ; แบบเป่าลมผ่านช่อง (Fipple); ลิ้นอิสระ; ฟลุตแบบ Labium / Duct; อื่นๆ